Utah statutes.
34A-7-204.   Suspension of inspection certificates -- Violation of part -- Misdemeanor -- Injunction.

(1) (a)  The division may suspend an inspection certificate issued under Section 34A-7-203 if it finds that the elevator or escalator for which the inspection certificate is issued does not meet the requirements of the safety code.

(b)  The suspension of an inspection certificate shall continue in effect until:

(i)  the elevator or escalator conforms to the safety code; and

(ii)  a new inspection certificate is issued.

(2)  It is a violation of this part and a class C misdemeanor to operate an elevator or escalator in this state if:

(a)  an inspection certificate for the elevator or escalator has not been issued;

(b) (i)  an inspection certificate for the elevator or escalator is suspended; and

(ii)  the requirements of Subsection (1)(b) are not met; or

(c)  the elevator or escalator is knowingly operated while constituting a safety hazard.

(3)  The division may bring a lawsuit in any court of this state to enjoin the operation of any elevator or escalator in violation of this part.



Enacted by Chapter 53, 1999 General Session

